Massachusetts, session 194th, S947.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 66 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 21 the
following section:-
Section 22. Public institutions of higher education, as set forth in section 5 of chapter
15A, and municipally owned institutions of higher education, shall not be required to produce
education records, including information designated by the public institution of higher education
as directory information, as defined under the Family Educational and Privacy Rights Act, 20
U.S.C. section 1232 (g). This section shall not apply to requests from federal, state, or municipal
agencies.
of 1